Tennessee, session 114, SB1066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-402(a), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subsection:
The state board of education shall publish the curriculum for the statewide DARE
program on the state board's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1066
003233
- 1 -